Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 526. ADDITIONAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMISSION AND EXECUTIVE COMMISSIONER

SUBCHAPTER A. INTERNET WEBSITES, ELECTRONIC RESOURCES, AND OTHER TECHNOLOGY

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Council" means the Records Management Interagency Coordinating Council.

(2) "Network" means the Texas Information and Referral Network.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0002. INTERNET WEBSITE FOR HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES INFORMATION. (a) The commission, in cooperation with the Department of Information Resources, shall maintain through the state electronic Internet portal project established by the department a generally accessible and interactive Internet website that contains information for the public regarding the services and programs each health and human services agency provides or administers in this state. The commission shall establish the website in such a manner that allows it to be located easily through electronic means.

(b) The Internet website must:

(1) include information that is:

(A) presented in a concise and easily understandable and accessible format; and

(B) organized by the type of service provided rather than by the agency or provider delivering the service;

(2) provide eligibility criteria for each health and human services agency program;

(3) provide application forms for each of the public assistance programs administered by a health and human services agency, including forms for:

(A) the financial assistance program under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code;

(B) Medicaid; and

(C) the nutritional assistance program under Chapter 33, Human Resources Code;

(4) to avoid duplication of functions and efforts, provide a link to an Internet website maintained by the network under Section 526.0005;

(5) provide the telephone number and, to the extent available, the e-mail address for each health and human services agency and local health and human services provider;

(6) be designed in a manner that allows a member of the public to electronically:

(A) send questions about each agency's programs or services; and

(B) receive the agency's responses to those questions; and

(7) be updated at least quarterly.

(c) In designing the Internet website, the commission shall comply with any state standards for Internet websites that are prescribed by the Department of Information Resources or any other state agency.

(d) The commission shall ensure that:

(1) the Internet website's design and applications:

(A) comply with generally acceptable standards for Internet accessibility for individuals with disabilities; and

(B) contain appropriate controls for information security; and

(2) the Internet website does not contain any confidential information, including any confidential information regarding a client of a human services provider.

(e) A health and human services agency, the network, and the Department of Information Resources shall cooperate with the commission to the extent necessary to enable the commission to perform its duties under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0003. INFORMATION ON LONG-TERM CARE SERVICES. (a) The Internet website maintained under Section 526.0002 must include information for consumers concerning long-term care services. The information must:

(1) be presented in a manner that is easily accessible to and understandable by a consumer; and

(2) allow a consumer to make informed choices concerning long-term care services and include:

(A) an explanation of the manner in which long-term care service delivery is administered in different counties through different programs the commission operates so that an individual can easily understand the service options available in the area in which that individual lives; and

(B) for the STAR+PLUS Medicaid managed care program, information in an accessible format, such as a table, that allows a consumer to evaluate the performance of each participating plan issuer, including for each issuer:

(i) the enrollment in each county;

(ii) additional "value-added" services provided;

(iii) a summary of the financial statistical report required under Section 540.0211;

(iv) complaint information;

(v) any sanction or penalty imposed by any state agency, including a sanction or penalty imposed by the commission or the Texas Department of Insurance;

(vi) consumer satisfaction information; and

(vii) other data, including relevant data from reports of external quality review organizations, that may be used by the consumer to evaluate the quality of the services provided.

(b) In addition to providing the information required by this section through the Internet website, the commission shall, on request by a consumer without Internet access, provide the consumer with a printed copy of the information from the Internet website. The commission may charge a reasonable fee for printing the information. The executive commissioner by rule shall establish the fee amount.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0004. TEXAS INFORMATION AND REFERRAL NETWORK. (a) The Texas Information and Referral Network is responsible for developing, coordinating, and implementing a statewide information and referral network that integrates existing community-based structures with state and local agencies. The network must:

(1) include information relating to transportation services provided to clients of state and local agencies;

(2) be capable of assisting with statewide disaster response and emergency management, including through the use of interstate agreements with out-of-state call centers to ensure preparedness and responsiveness;

(3) include technology capable of communicating with clients of state and local agencies using electronic text messaging; and

(4) include a publicly accessible Internet-based system to provide real-time, searchable data about the location and number of clients of state and local agencies using the system and the types of requests the clients made.

(b) The commission shall cooperate with the council and the comptroller to establish a single method of categorizing information about health and human services to be used by the council and the network. The network, in cooperation with the council and the comptroller, shall ensure that:

(1) information relating to health and human services is included in each residential telephone directory published by a for-profit publisher and distributed to the public at minimal or no cost; and

(2) the single method of categorizing information about health and human services is used in the directory.

(c) A health and human services agency or a public or private entity receiving state-appropriated funds to provide health and human services shall provide the council and the network with information about the health and human services the agency or entity provides for inclusion in the statewide information and referral network, residential telephone directories described by Subsection (b), and any other materials produced under the council's or the network's direction. The agency or entity shall provide the information in the format the council or the network requires and shall update the information at least quarterly or as required by the council or the network.

(d) The Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs shall provide the network with information regarding the department's housing and community affairs programs for inclusion in the statewide information and referral network. The department shall provide the information in a form the commission determines and shall update the information at least quarterly.

(e) Each local workforce development board, the Texas Head Start State Collaboration Office, and each school district shall provide the network with information regarding eligibility for and availability of child-care and education services as defined by Section 526.0006 for inclusion in the statewide information and referral network. The local workforce development boards, Texas Head Start State Collaboration Office, and school districts shall provide the information in a form the executive commissioner determines.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0005. INTERNET WEBSITE FOR HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES REFERRAL INFORMATION. (a) The network may develop an Internet website to provide information to the public regarding the health and human services provided by public or private entities throughout this state.

(b) The material on the network Internet website must be:

(1) geographically indexed, including by type of service provided within each geographic area; and

(2) designed to inform an individual about the health and human services provided in the area in which the individual lives.

(c) The Internet website may contain:

(1) links to the Internet websites of any local health and human services provider;

(2) the name, address, and telephone number of organizations providing health and human services in a county and a description of the type of services those organizations provide; and

(3) any other information that educates the public about the health and human services provided in a county.

(d) The network shall coordinate with the Department of Information Resources to maintain the Internet website through the state electronic Internet portal project established by the department.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0006. INTERNET WEBSITE FOR CHILD-CARE AND EDUCATION SERVICES REFERRAL INFORMATION. (a) In this section, "child-care and education services" means:

(1) subsidized child-care services administered by the Texas Workforce Commission and local workforce development boards and funded wholly or partly by federal child-care development funds;

(2) child-care and education services provided by a Head Start or Early Head Start program provider;

(3) child-care and education services provided by a school district through a prekindergarten or after-school program; and

(4) any other government-funded child-care and education services, other than education and services a school district provides as part of the general program of public education, designed to educate or provide care for children younger than 13 years of age in middle-income or low-income families.

(b) In addition to providing health and human services information, the network Internet website established under Section 526.0005 must provide information to the public regarding child-care and education services public or private entities provide throughout this state. The Internet website will serve as a single point of access through which an individual may be directed toward information regarding the manner of or location for applying for all child-care and education services available in the individual's community.

(c) To the extent resources are available, the Internet website must:

(1) be geographically indexed and designed to inform an individual about the child-care and education services provided in the area in which the individual lives;

(2) contain prescreening questions to determine an individual's or family's probable eligibility for child-care and education services; and

(3) be designed in a manner that allows network staff to:

(A) provide an applicant with the telephone number, physical address, and e-mail address of the:

(i) nearest Head Start or Early Head Start office or center and local workforce development center; and

(ii) appropriate school district; and

(B) send an e-mail message to each appropriate entity described by Paragraph (A) containing each applicant's name and contact information and a description of the services for which the applicant is applying.

(d) On receipt of an e-mail message from the network under Subsection (c)(3)(B), each applicable entity shall:

(1) contact the applicant to verify information regarding the applicant's eligibility for available child-care and education services; and

(2) on certifying the applicant's eligibility, match the applicant with entities providing those services in the applicant's community, including local workforce development boards, local child-care providers, or a Head Start or Early Head Start program provider.

(e) The child-care resource and referral network described by Chapter 310, Labor Code, and each entity providing child-care and education services in this state, including local workforce development boards, the Texas Education Agency, school districts, Head Start and Early Head Start program providers, municipalities, counties, and other political subdivisions of this state, shall cooperate with the network as necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0007. INTERNET WEBSITE FOR REFERRAL INFORMATION ON HOUSING OPTIONS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS. (a) The commission shall make available through the network Internet website established under Section 526.0005 information regarding housing options for individuals with mental illness provided by public or private entities throughout this state. The Internet website serves as a single point of access through which an individual may be directed toward information regarding the manner of or where to apply for housing for individuals with mental illness in the individual's community. In this subsection, "private entity" includes any provider of housing specifically for individuals with mental illness other than a state agency, county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state, regardless of whether the provider accepts payment for providing housing for those individuals.

(b) To the extent resources are available, the Internet website must be geographically indexed and designed to inform an individual about the housing options for individuals with mental illness provided in the area in which the individual lives.

(c) The Internet website must contain a searchable listing of available housing options for individuals with mental illness by type with a definition for each type of housing and an explanation of the populations of individuals with mental illness generally served by that type of housing. The list must include the following types of housing for individuals with mental illness:

(1) state hospitals;

(2) step-down units in state hospitals;

(3) community hospitals;

(4) private psychiatric hospitals;

(5) an inpatient treatment service provider in the network of service providers assembled by a local mental health authority under Section 533.035(c), Health and Safety Code;

(6) assisted living facilities;

(7) continuing care facilities;

(8) boarding homes;

(9) emergency shelters for individuals who are homeless;

(10) transitional housing intended to move individuals who are homeless to permanent housing;

(11) supportive housing or long-term, community-based affordable housing that provides supportive services;

(12) general residential operations, as defined by Section 42.002, Human Resources Code; and

(13) residential treatment centers or a type of general residential operation that provides services to children with emotional disorders in a structured and supportive environment.

(d) For each housing facility named in the listing of available housing options for individuals with mental illness, the Internet website must indicate whether the provider operating the housing facility is licensed by this state.

(e) The Internet website must display a disclaimer that the information provided is for informational purposes only and is not an endorsement or recommendation of any type of housing or any housing facility.

(f) Each entity providing housing specifically for individuals with mental illness in this state, including the commission, counties, municipalities, other political subdivisions of this state, and private entities, shall cooperate with the network as necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0008. COMPLIANCE WITH NATIONAL ELECTRONIC DATA INTERCHANGE STANDARDS FOR HEALTH CARE INFORMATION. Each health and human services agency and other state agency that acts as a health care provider or a claims payer for the provision of health care shall:

(1) process information related to health care in compliance with national data interchange standards adopted under Subtitle F, Title II, Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq.), within the applicable deadline established under federal law or federal regulations; or

(2) demonstrate to the commission the reasons the agency should not be required to comply with Subdivision (1), and to the extent allowed under federal law, obtain the commission's approval to:

(A) comply with the standards at a later date; or

(B) not comply with one or more of the standards.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0009. TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR HUMAN SERVICES PROVIDERS. (a) A health and human services agency shall, in conjunction with the Department of Information Resources, coordinate and enhance the agency's existing Internet website to provide technical assistance for human services providers. The commission shall take the lead and ensure involvement of the agencies with the greatest potential to produce cost savings.

(b) Assistance provided under this section:

(1) must include information on the impact of federal and state welfare reform changes on human services providers;

(2) may include information in the following subjects:

(A) case management;

(B) contract management;

(C) financial management;

(D) performance measurement and evaluation;

(E) research; and

(F) other matters the commission considers appropriate; and

(3) may not include any confidential information regarding a client of a human services provider.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0010. INFORMATION RESOURCES MANAGER REPORTS. Notwithstanding Section 2054.075(b), the information resources manager of a health and human services agency shall report directly to the executive commissioner or a deputy executive commissioner the executive commissioner designates.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROGRAMS AND SERVICES PROVIDED OR ADMINISTERED BY COMMISSION

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0051. RESTRICTIONS ON AWARDS TO FAMILY PLANNING SERVICE PROVIDERS. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, money appropriated to the commission for the purpose of providing family planning services must be awarded:

(1) to eligible entities in the following order of descending priority:

(A) public entities that provide family planning services, including state, county, and local community health clinics and federally qualified health centers;

(B) nonpublic entities that provide comprehensive primary and preventive care services in addition to family planning services; and

(C) nonpublic entities that provide family planning services but do not provide comprehensive primary and preventive care services; or

(2) as otherwise directed by the legislature in the General Appropriations Act.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the commission shall, in compliance with federal law, ensure distribution of funds for family planning services in a manner that does not severely limit or eliminate access to those services in any region of this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0052. INFORMATION FOR CERTAIN ENROLLEES IN HEALTHY TEXAS WOMEN PROGRAM. (a) In this section, "Healthy Texas Women program" means a program the commission operates that is substantially similar to the demonstration project operated under former Section 32.0248, Human Resources Code, and that is intended to expand access to preventive health and family planning services for women in this state.

(b) This section applies to a woman who is automatically enrolled in the Healthy Texas Women program following a pregnancy for which the woman received Medicaid, but who is no longer eligible to participate in Medicaid.

(c) After a woman to whom this section applies is enrolled in the Healthy Texas Women program, the commission shall provide to the woman:

(1) information about the Healthy Texas Women program, including the services provided under the program; and

(2) a list of health care providers who participate in the Healthy Texas Women program and are located in the same geographical area in which the woman resides.

(d) The commission shall consult with the Texas Maternal Mortality and Morbidity Review Committee established under Chapter 34, Health and Safety Code, to improve the process for providing the information required by Subsection (c), including by determining:

(1) the best time for providing the information; and

(2) the manner of providing the information, including the information about health care providers described by Subsection (c)(2).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0053. VACCINES FOR CHILDREN PROGRAM PROVIDER ENROLLMENT; IMMUNIZATION REGISTRY. (a) In this section, "vaccines for children program" means the program the Department of State Health Services operates under 42 U.S.C. Section 1396s.

(b) The commission shall ensure that a provider may enroll in the vaccines for children program on the same form the provider completes to apply as a Medicaid health care provider.

(c) The commission shall allow providers to:

(1) report vaccines administered under the vaccines for children program to the immunization registry established under Section 161.007, Health and Safety Code; and

(2) use the immunization registry, including individually identifiable information in accordance with state and federal law, to determine whether a child received an immunization.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0054. PRIOR AUTHORIZATION FOR HIGH-COST MEDICAL SERVICES AND PROCEDURES. (a) The commission may:

(1) evaluate and implement, as appropriate, procedures, policies, and methodologies to require prior authorization for high-cost medical services and procedures; and

(2) contract with qualified service providers or organizations to perform those functions.

(b) A procedure, policy, or methodology implemented under this section must comply with any prohibitions in state or federal law on limits in the amount, duration, or scope of medically necessary services for Medicaid recipients who are children.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0055. TAILORED BENEFIT PACKAGES FOR NON-MEDICAID POPULATIONS. (a) The commission shall identify state or federal non-Medicaid programs that provide health care services to individuals whose health care needs could be met by providing customized benefits through a system of care that is used under a Medicaid tailored benefit package implemented under Section 532.0351.

(b) If the commission determines it is feasible and to the extent permitted by federal and state law, the commission shall:

(1) provide the health care services for individuals described by Subsection (a) through the applicable Medicaid tailored benefit package; and

(2) if appropriate or necessary to provide the services as required by Subdivision (1), develop and implement a system of blended funding methodologies to provide the services in that manner.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0056. PILOT PROGRAM TO PREVENT SPREAD OF INFECTIOUS OR COMMUNICABLE DISEASES. The commission may provide guidance to the local health authority of Bexar County in establishing a pilot program funded by the county to prevent the spread of HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, and other infectious and communicable diseases. The program may include a disease control program that provides for the anonymous exchange of used hypodermic needles and syringes.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0057. APPLICATION REQUIREMENT FOR COLONIAS PROJECTS. (a) In this section, "colonia" means a geographic area that:

(1) is an economically distressed area as defined by Section 17.921, Water Code;

(2) is located in a county any part of which is within 62 miles of an international border; and

(3) consists of 11 or more dwellings located in proximity to each other in an area that may be described as a community or neighborhood.

(b) The commission shall require an applicant for funds under any project the commission funds that provides assistance to colonias to submit to the commission any existing colonia classification number for each colonia that may be served by the project proposed in the application.

(c) The commission may contact the secretary of state or the secretary of state's representative to obtain a classification number for a colonia that does not have a classification number. On request of the commission, the secretary of state or the secretary of state's representative shall assign a classification number to the colonia.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0058. RULES REGARDING REFUGEE RESETTLEMENT. (a) In this section, "local resettlement agency" and "national voluntary agency" have the meanings assigned by 45 C.F.R. Section 400.2.

(b) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules to ensure that:

(1) any refugee placement report required under a federal refugee resettlement program includes local governmental and community input; and

(2) governmental entities and officials are provided with related information.

(c) In adopting the rules, the executive commissioner shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, ensure that meetings are convened at least quarterly in the communities proposed for refugee placement at which representatives of local resettlement agencies have an opportunity to consult with and obtain feedback regarding proposed refugee placement from:

(1) local governmental entities and officials, including:

(A) municipal and county officials;

(B) local school district officials; and

(C) representatives of local law enforcement agencies; and

(2) other community stakeholders, including:

(A) major providers under the local health care system; and

(B) major employers of refugees.

(d) In adopting the rules, the executive commissioner shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, ensure that:

(1) a local resettlement agency:

(A) considers all feedback obtained in meetings conducted under Subsection (c) before preparing a proposed annual report on the placement of refugees for purposes of 8 U.S.C. Section 1522(b)(7)(E);

(B) informs the state and local governmental entities and officials and community stakeholders described by Subsection (c) of the proposed annual report; and

(C) develops a final annual report for the national voluntary agencies and the commission that includes a summary regarding the manner in which stakeholder input contributed to the report; and

(2) the commission:

(A) obtains from local resettlement agencies the preliminary number of refugees the local resettlement agencies recommended to the national voluntary agencies for placement in communities throughout this state and provides that information to local governmental entities and officials in those communities; and

(B) obtains from the United States Department of State or other appropriate federal agency the number of refugees apportioned to this state and provides that information and information regarding the number of refugees intended to be placed in each community in this state to local governmental entities and officials in those communities.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0059. PROHIBITED AWARD OF CONTRACTS TO MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS FOR CERTAIN CRIMINAL CONVICTIONS. The commission may not contract with a managed care organization, including a health maintenance organization, or a pharmacy benefit manager if, in the preceding three years, the organization or manager, in connection with a bid, proposal, or contract with the commission, was subject to a final judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction resulting in:

(1) a conviction for:

(A) a criminal offense under state or federal law related to the delivery of an item or service;

(B) a criminal offense under state or federal law related to neglect or abuse of patients in connection with the delivery of an item or service; or

(C) a felony offense under state or federal law related to fraud, theft, embezzlement, breach of fiduciary responsibility, or other financial misconduct; or

(2) the imposition of a penalty or fine in the amount of $500,000 or more in a state or federal administrative proceeding based on a conviction for a criminal offense under state or federal law.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER C. COORDINATION OF QUALITY INITIATIVES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0101. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "waiver" means the Texas Healthcare Transformation and Quality Improvement Program waiver issued under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1315).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0102. OPERATIONAL PLAN TO COORDINATE MAJOR QUALITY INITIATIVES. (a) The commission shall develop and implement a comprehensive, coordinated operational plan to ensure a consistent approach across the major quality initiatives of the health and human services system for improving the quality of health care. The plan must include broad goals for improving the quality of health care in this state, including health care services provided through Medicaid.

(b) The plan may evaluate:

(1) the Delivery System Reform Incentive Payment (DSRIP) program under the waiver;

(2) enhancing funding to disproportionate share hospitals in this state;

(3) Section 1332 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Section 18052);

(4) enhancing uncompensated care pool payments to hospitals in this state under the waiver;

(5) home and community-based services state plan options under Section 1915(i) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(i)); and

(6) a contingency plan in the event the commission does not obtain an extension or renewal of the uncompensated care pool provisions or any other provisions of the granted waiver.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0103. REVISION AND EVALUATION OF MAJOR QUALITY INITIATIVES. Notwithstanding other law, the commission shall revise major quality initiatives of the health and human services system in accordance with the operational plan and health care quality improvement goals developed under Section 526.0102. To the extent possible, the commission shall ensure that outcome measure data is collected and reported consistently across all major quality initiatives to improve the evaluation of the initiatives' statewide impact.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0104. INCENTIVES FOR MAJOR QUALITY INITIATIVE COORDINATION. The commission shall consider and, if appropriate, develop in accordance with this subchapter, incentives that promote coordination among the various major quality initiatives, including projects and initiatives approved under the granted waiver.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER D. TEXAS HEALTH OPPORTUNITY POOL TRUST FUND

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "fund" means the Texas health opportunity pool trust fund established under Section 526.0153.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0152. AUTHORITY TO OBTAIN FEDERAL WAIVER. (a) The executive commissioner may seek a waiver under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1315) to the state Medicaid plan to allow the commission to more efficiently and effectively use federal money paid to this state under various programs to defray costs associated with providing uncompensated health care in this state by using that federal money, appropriated state money to the extent necessary, and any other money described by this section for purposes consistent with this subchapter.

(b) The executive commissioner may include the following federal money in the waiver:

(1) money provided under:

(A) the disproportionate share hospitals program;

(B) the upper payment limit supplemental payment program; or

(C) both;

(2) money provided by the federal government in lieu of some or all of the payments provided under one or both of the programs described by Subdivision (1);

(3) any combination of funds authorized to be pooled by Subdivisions (1) and (2); and

(4) any other money available for that purpose, including:

(A) federal money and money identified under Subsection (c);

(B) gifts, grants, or donations for that purpose;

(C) local funds received by this state through intergovernmental transfers; and

(D) if approved in the waiver, federal money obtained through the use of certified public expenditures.

(c) The commission shall seek to optimize federal funding by:

(1) identifying health care-related state and local funds and program expenditures that, before September 1, 2011, are not being matched with federal money; and

(2) exploring the feasibility of:

(A) certifying or otherwise using those funds and expenditures as state expenditures for which this state may receive federal matching money; and

(B) depositing federal matching money received as provided by Paragraph (A) with other federal money deposited as provided by Section 526.0154, or substituting that federal matching money for federal money that otherwise would be received under the disproportionate share hospitals and upper payment limit supplemental payment programs as a match for local funds received by this state through intergovernmental transfers.

(d) The terms of a waiver approved under this section must:

(1) include safeguards to ensure that the total amount of federal money provided under the disproportionate share hospitals or upper payment limit supplemental payment program that is deposited as provided by Section 526.0154 is, for a particular state fiscal year, at least equal to the greater of the annualized amount provided to this state under those supplemental payment programs during:

(A) state fiscal year 2011, excluding retroactive payment amounts provided during that state fiscal year; or

(B) the state fiscal years during which the waiver is in effect; and

(2) allow this state to develop a methodology for allocating money in the fund to:

(A) supplement Medicaid hospital reimbursements under a waiver that includes terms consistent with, or that produce revenues consistent with, disproportionate share hospital and upper payment limit principles;

(B) reduce the number of individuals in this state who do not have health benefits coverage; and

(C) maintain and enhance the community public health infrastructure provided by hospitals.

(e) In seeking a waiver under this section, the executive commissioner shall attempt to:

(1) obtain maximum flexibility in the use of the money in the fund for purposes consistent with this subchapter;

(2) include an annual adjustment to the aggregate caps under the upper payment limit supplemental payment program to account for inflation, population growth, and other appropriate demographic factors that affect the ability of residents of this state to obtain health benefits coverage;

(3) ensure, for the term of the waiver, that the aggregate caps under the upper payment limit supplemental payment program for each of the three classes of hospitals are not less than the aggregate caps applied during state fiscal year 2007; and

(4) to the extent allowed by federal law, including federal regulations, and federal waiver authority, preserve the federal supplemental payment program payments made to hospitals, the state match with respect to which is funded by intergovernmental transfers or certified public expenditures that are used to optimize Medicaid payments to safety net providers for uncompensated care, and preserve allocation methods for those payments, unless the need for the payments is revised through measures that reduce the Medicaid shortfall or uncompensated care costs.

(f) The executive commissioner shall seek broad-based stakeholder input in the development of the waiver under this section and shall provide information to stakeholders regarding the terms of the waiver for which the executive commissioner seeks federal approval.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0153. TEXAS HEALTH OPPORTUNITY POOL TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED. (a) Subject to approval of the waiver authorized by Section 526.0152, the Texas health opportunity pool trust fund is created as a trust fund outside the state treasury to be held by the comptroller and administered by the commission as trustee on behalf of residents of this state who do not have private health benefits coverage and health care providers providing uncompensated care to those individuals.

(b) The commission may spend money in the fund only for purposes consistent with this subchapter and the terms of the waiver authorized by Section 526.0152.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0154. DEPOSITS TO FUND. (a) The comptroller shall deposit in the fund:

(1) federal money provided to this state under the disproportionate share hospitals supplemental payment program, the hospital upper payment limit supplemental payment program, or both, other than money provided under those programs to state-owned and -operated hospitals, and all other nonsupplemental payment program federal money provided to this state that is included in the waiver authorized by Section 526.0152; and

(2) state money appropriated to the fund.

(b) The commission and comptroller may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source, and receive intergovernmental transfers, for purposes consistent with this subchapter and the terms of the waiver authorized by Section 526.0152. The comptroller shall deposit a gift, grant, or donation made for those purposes in the fund.

(c) Any intergovernmental transfer received, including associated federal matching funds, shall be used, if feasible, for the purposes intended by the transferring entity and in accordance with the terms of the waiver authorized by Section 526.0152.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0155. USE OF FUND IN GENERAL; RULES FOR ALLOCATION. (a) Except as otherwise provided by the terms of a waiver authorized by Section 526.0152, money in the fund may be used:

(1) subject to Section 526.0156, to provide to health care providers reimbursements that:

(A) are based on the providers' costs related to providing uncompensated care; and

(B) compensate the providers for at least a portion of those costs;

(2) to reduce the number of individuals in this state who do not have health benefits coverage;

(3) to reduce the need for uncompensated health care provided by hospitals in this state; and

(4) for any other purpose specified by this subchapter or the waiver.

(b) On approval of the waiver authorized by Section 526.0152, the executive commissioner shall:

(1) seek input from a broad base of stakeholder representatives on the development of rules with respect to and for the administration of the fund; and

(2) by rule develop a methodology for allocating money in the fund that is consistent with the terms of the waiver.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0156. REIMBURSEMENTS FOR UNCOMPENSATED HEALTH CARE COSTS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by the terms of a waiver authorized by Section 526.0152 and subject to Subsections (b) and (c), money in the fund may be allocated to hospitals in this state and political subdivisions of this state to defray the costs of providing uncompensated health care.

(b) To be eligible for money allocated from the fund under this section, a hospital or political subdivision must use a portion of the money to implement strategies that will reduce the need for uncompensated inpatient and outpatient care, including care provided in a hospital emergency room. The strategies may include:

(1) fostering improved access for patients to primary care systems or other programs that offer those patients medical homes, including the following programs:

(A) regional or local health care programs;

(B) programs to provide premium subsidies for health benefits coverage; and

(C) other programs to increase access to health benefits coverage; and

(2) creating health care systems efficiencies, such as using electronic medical records systems.

(c) The allocation methodology the executive commissioner develops under Section 526.0155(b) must specify the percentage of the money from the fund allocated to a hospital or political subdivision that the hospital or political subdivision must use for strategies described by Subsection (b) of this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0157. INCREASING ACCESS TO HEALTH BENEFITS COVERAGE. (a) Except as otherwise provided by the terms of a waiver authorized by Section 526.0152, money in the fund that is available to reduce the number of individuals in this state who do not have health benefits coverage or to reduce the need for uncompensated health care provided by hospitals in this state may be used for purposes relating to increasing access to health benefits coverage for individuals with low income, including:

(1) providing premium payment assistance to those individuals through a premium payment assistance program developed under this section;

(2) making contributions to health savings accounts for those individuals; and

(3) providing other financial assistance to those individuals through alternate mechanisms established by hospitals in this state or political subdivisions of this state that meet certain commission-specified criteria.

(b) The commission and the Texas Department of Insurance shall jointly develop a premium payment assistance program designed to assist individuals described by Subsection (a) in obtaining and maintaining health benefits coverage. The program may provide assistance in the form of payments for all or part of the premiums for that coverage. In developing the program, the executive commissioner shall adopt rules establishing:

(1) eligibility criteria for the program;

(2) the amount of premium payment assistance that will be provided under the program;

(3) the process by which that assistance will be paid; and

(4) the mechanism for measuring and reporting the number of individuals who obtained health insurance or other health benefits coverage as a result of the program.

(c) The commission shall implement the premium payment assistance program developed under Subsection (b), subject to availability of money in the fund for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0158. INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by the terms of a waiver authorized by Section 526.0152 and subject to Subsection (c), money in the fund may be used for purposes related to developing and implementing initiatives to improve the infrastructure of local provider networks that provide services to Medicaid recipients and individuals with low income and without health benefits coverage in this state.

(b) The infrastructure improvements may include developing and implementing a system for maintaining medical records in an electronic format.

(c) Not more than 10 percent of the total amount of the money in the fund used in a state fiscal year for purposes other than providing reimbursements to hospitals for uncompensated health care may be used for infrastructure improvements described by Subsection (b).

(d) Money from the fund may not be used to finance the construction, improvement, or renovation of a building or land unless the commission approves the construction, improvement, or renovation in accordance with rules the executive commissioner adopts for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER E. LONG-TERM CARE FACILITIES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0201. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "council" means the Long-Term Care Facilities Council.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0202. INFORMAL DISPUTE RESOLUTION FOR CERTAIN LONG-TERM CARE FACILITIES. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall establish an informal dispute resolution process in accordance with this section. The process must:

(1) provide for adjudication by an appropriate disinterested person of disputes relating to a proposed commission enforcement action or related proceeding under:

(A) Section 32.021(d), Human Resources Code; or

(B) Chapter 242, 247, or 252, Health and Safety Code; and

(2) require:

(A) a facility to request informal dispute resolution not later than the 10th calendar day after the commission notifies the facility of the violation of a standard or standards; and

(B) the completion of the process not later than:

(i) the 30th calendar day after receipt of a request for informal dispute resolution from a facility, other than an assisted living facility; or

(ii) the 90th calendar day after receipt of a request from an assisted living facility for informal dispute resolution.

(b) As part of the informal dispute resolution process, the commission shall contract with an appropriate disinterested person to adjudicate disputes between a facility licensed under Chapter 242 or 247, Health and Safety Code, and the commission concerning a statement of violations the commission prepares in connection with a survey the commission conducts of the facility. The contracting person shall adjudicate all disputes described by this subsection. The informal dispute resolution process for the statement of violations must require:

(1) the surveyor who conducted the survey for which the statement was prepared to be available to clarify or answer questions asked by the contracting person or by the facility related to the facility or statement; and

(2) the commission's review of the facility's informal dispute resolution request for a standard of care violation to be conducted by a registered nurse with long-term care experience.

(c) Section 2009.053 does not apply to the commission's selection of an appropriate disinterested person under Subsection (b).

(d) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules to adjudicate claims in contested cases.

(e) The commission may not delegate to another state agency the commission's responsibility to administer the informal dispute resolution process.

(f) The rules adopted under Subsection (a) that relate to a dispute described by Section 247.051(a), Health and Safety Code, must incorporate the requirements of Section 247.051, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0203. LONG-TERM CARE FACILITIES COUNCIL. (a) In this section, "long-term care facility" means a facility subject to regulation under Section 32.021(d), Human Resources Code, or Chapter 242, 247, or 252, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The executive commissioner shall establish a long-term care facilities council as a permanent advisory committee to the commission. The council is composed of the following members the executive commissioner appoints:

(1) at least one member who is a for-profit nursing facility provider;

(2) at least one member who is a nonprofit nursing facility provider;

(3) at least one member who is an assisted living services provider;

(4) at least one member responsible for survey enforcement within the state survey and certification agency;

(5) at least one member responsible for survey inspection within the state survey and certification agency;

(6) at least one member of the state agency responsible for informal dispute resolution;

(7) at least one member with expertise in Medicaid quality-based payment systems for long-term care facilities;

(8) at least one member who is a practicing medical director of a long-term care facility;

(9) at least one member who is a physician with expertise in infectious disease or public health; and

(10) at least one member who is a community-based provider at an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities licensed under Chapter 252, Health and Safety Code.

(c) The executive commissioner shall designate a council member to serve as presiding officer. The council members shall elect any other necessary officers.

(d) A council member serves at the will of the executive commissioner.

(e) The council shall meet at the call of the executive commissioner.

(f) A council member is not entitled to reimbursement of expenses or to compensation for service on the council.

(g) Chapter 2110 does not apply to the council.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0204. COUNCIL DUTIES; REPORT. (a) In this section, "long-term care facility" has the meaning assigned by Section 526.0203.

(b) The council shall:

(1) study and make recommendations regarding a consistent survey and informal dispute resolution process for long-term care facilities, Medicaid quality-based payment systems for those facilities, and the allocation of Medicaid beds in those facilities;

(2) study and make recommendations regarding best practices and protocols to make survey, inspection, and informal dispute resolution processes more efficient and less burdensome on long-term care facilities;

(3) recommend uniform standards for those processes;

(4) study and make recommendations regarding Medicaid quality-based payment systems and a rate-setting methodology for long-term care facilities; and

(5) study and make recommendations relating to the allocation of and need for Medicaid beds in long-term care facilities, including studying and making recommendations relating to:

(A) the effectiveness of rules adopted by the executive commissioner relating to the procedures for certifying and decertifying Medicaid beds in long-term care facilities; and

(B) the need for modifications to those rules to better control the procedures for certifying and decertifying Medicaid beds in long-term care facilities.

(c) Not later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the council shall submit a report on the council's findings and recommendations to the executive commissioner, the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the appropriate legislative committees.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER F. UNCOMPENSATED HOSPITAL CARE REPORTING AND ANALYSIS; ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0251. RULES. The executive commissioner shall adopt rules providing for:

(1) a standard definition of "uncompensated hospital care";

(2) a methodology for hospitals in this state to use in computing the cost of uncompensated hospital care that incorporates a standard set of adjustments to a hospital's initial computation of the cost that accounts for all funding streams that:

(A) are not patient-specific; and

(B) are used to offset the hospital's initially computed amount of uncompensated hospital care; and

(3) procedures for hospitals to use in reporting the cost of uncompensated hospital care to the commission and in analyzing that cost, which may include procedures by which the commission may periodically verify the completeness and accuracy of the reported information.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0252. NOTICE OF FAILURE TO REPORT; ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY. (a) The commission shall notify the attorney general of a hospital's failure to report the cost of uncompensated hospital care on or before the report due date in accordance with rules adopted under Section 526.0251(3).

(b) On receipt of the notice, the attorney general shall impose an administrative penalty on the hospital in the amount of $1,000 for each day after the report due date that the hospital has not submitted the report, not to exceed $10,000.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0253. NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE OR INACCURATE REPORT; ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY. (a) If the commission determines that a hospital submitted a report with incomplete or inaccurate information using a procedure adopted under Section 526.0251(3), the commission shall:

(1) notify the hospital of the specific information the hospital must submit; and

(2) prescribe a date by which the hospital must provide that information.

(b) If the hospital fails to submit the specified information on or before the date the commission prescribes, the commission shall notify the attorney general of that failure.

(c) On receipt of the commission's notice, the attorney general shall impose an administrative penalty on the hospital in an amount not to exceed $10,000. In determining the amount of the penalty to be imposed, the attorney general shall consider:

(1) the seriousness of the violation;

(2) whether the hospital had previously committed a violation; and

(3) the amount necessary to deter the hospital from committing future violations.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0254. REQUIREMENTS FOR ATTORNEY GENERAL NOTIFICATION. The commission's notification to the attorney general under Section 526.0252 or 526.0253 must include the facts on which the commission based the determination that the hospital failed to submit a report or failed to completely and accurately report information, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0255. ATTORNEY GENERAL NOTICE TO HOSPITAL. The attorney general shall give written notice of the commission's notification to the attorney general under Section 526.0252 or 526.0253 to the hospital that is the subject of the notification. The notice must include:

(1) a brief summary of the alleged violation;

(2) a statement of the amount of the administrative penalty to be imposed; and

(3) a statement of the hospital's right to a hearing on the alleged violation, the amount of the penalty, or both.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0256. PENALTY PAID OR HEARING REQUESTED. Not later than the 20th day after the date the attorney general sends the notice under Section 526.0255, the hospital receiving the notice must submit a written request for a hearing or remit the amount of the administrative penalty to the attorney general. Failure to timely request a hearing or remit the amount of the administrative penalty results in a waiver of the right to a hearing under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0257. HEARING. (a) If a hospital requests a hearing in accordance with Section 526.0256, the attorney general shall conduct the hearing in accordance with Chapter 2001.

(b) If the hearing results in a finding that a violation has occurred, the attorney general shall:

(1) provide to the hospital written notice of:

(A) the findings established at the hearing; and

(B) the amount of the penalty; and

(2) enter an order requiring the hospital to pay the amount of the penalty.

(c) An order entered by the attorney general under this section is subject to judicial review as a contested case under Chapter 2001.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0258. OPTIONS FOLLOWING DECISION: PAY OR APPEAL. Not later than the 30th day after the date the hospital receives the order entered by the attorney general under Section 526.0257, the hospital shall:

(1) pay the amount of the administrative penalty;

(2) remit the amount of the penalty to the attorney general for deposit in an escrow account and file a petition for judicial review contesting the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both; or

(3) without paying the amount of the penalty:

(A) file a petition for judicial review contesting the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both; and

(B) file with the court a sworn affidavit stating that the hospital is financially unable to pay the amount of the penalty.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0259. DECISION BY COURT. (a) If a hospital paid an administrative penalty imposed under this subchapter and on review a court does not sustain the occurrence of the violation or finds that the amount of the penalty should be reduced, the attorney general shall remit the appropriate amount to the hospital not later than the 30th day after the date the court's judgment becomes final.

(b) If the court sustains the occurrence of the violation:

(1) the court:

(A) shall order the hospital to pay the amount of the administrative penalty; and

(B) may award to the attorney general the attorney's fees and court costs the attorney general incurred in defending the action; and

(2) the attorney general shall remit the amount of the penalty to the comptroller for deposit in the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0260. RECOVERY OF PENALTY. If a hospital does not pay the amount of an administrative penalty imposed under this subchapter after the attorney general's order becomes final for all purposes, the attorney general may enforce the penalty as provided by law for legal judgments.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER G. RURAL HOSPITAL INITIATIVES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0301. STRATEGIC PLAN FOR RURAL HOSPITAL SERVICES; REPORT. (a) The commission shall develop and implement a strategic plan to ensure that the citizens in this state residing in rural areas have access to hospital services.

(b) The strategic plan must include:

(1) a proposal for using at least one of the following methods to ensure access to hospital services in the rural areas of this state:

(A) an enhanced cost reimbursement methodology for the payment of rural hospitals participating in the Medicaid managed care program in conjunction with a supplemental payment program for rural hospitals to cover costs incurred in providing services to recipients;

(B) a hospital rate enhancement program applicable only to rural hospitals;

(C) a reduction of punitive actions under Medicaid that require reimbursement for Medicaid payments made to a rural hospital provider, a reduction of the frequency of payment reductions under Medicaid made to rural hospitals, and an enhancement of payments made under merit-based programs or similar programs for rural hospitals;

(D) a reduction of state regulatory-related costs related to the commission's review of rural hospitals; or

(E) in accordance with rules the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services adopts, the establishment of a minimum fee schedule that applies to payments made to rural hospitals by Medicaid managed care organizations; and

(2) target dates for achieving goals related to the proposal described by Subdivision (1).

(c) Not later than November 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit a report regarding the commission's development and implementation of the strategic plan to:

(1) the legislature;

(2) the governor; and

(3) the Legislative Budget Board.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0302. RURAL HOSPITAL ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) The commission shall establish the rural hospital advisory committee, either as an advisory committee or as a subcommittee of the hospital payment advisory committee, to advise the commission on issues relating specifically to rural hospitals.

(b) The rural hospital advisory committee is composed of interested individuals the executive commissioner appoints. Section 2110.002 does not apply to the advisory committee.

(c) An advisory committee member serves without compensation.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0303. COLLABORATION WITH OFFICE OF RURAL AFFAIRS. The commission shall collaborate with the Office of Rural Affairs to ensure that this state is pursuing to the fullest extent possible federal grants, funding opportunities, and support programs available to rural hospitals as administered by the Health Resources and Services Administration and the Office of Minority Health in the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER H. MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Medical transportation program" means the program that provides nonemergency transportation services to recipients under Medicaid, subject to Section 526.0353, the children with special health care needs program, and the transportation for indigent cancer patients program, who have no other means of transportation.

(2) "Nonemergency transportation service" means nonemergency medical transportation services authorized under:

(A) for a Medicaid recipient, the state Medicaid plan; and

(B) for a recipient under another program described by Subdivision (1), that program.

(3) "Regional contracted broker" means an entity that contracts with the commission to provide or arrange for the provision of nonemergency transportation services under the medical transportation program.

(4) "Transportation network company" has the meaning assigned by Section 2402.001, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0352. DUTY TO PROVIDE MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION SERVICES. (a) The commission shall provide medical transportation services for clients of eligible health and human services programs.

(b) The commission may contract with any public or private transportation provider or with any regional transportation broker for the provision of public transportation services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0353. APPLICABILITY. Sections 526.0354-526.0360 do not apply to the provision of nonemergency transportation services to a Medicaid recipient who is enrolled in a managed care plan offered by a Medicaid managed care organization.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0354. COMMISSION SUPERVISION OF MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM. Notwithstanding any other law, the commission:

(1) shall directly supervise the administration and operation of the medical transportation program under this subchapter; and

(2) may not delegate the commission's duty to supervise the medical transportation program to any other person, including through a contract with the Texas Department of Transportation for the department to assume any of the commission's responsibilities relating to the provision of services through that program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0355. CONTRACT FOR PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION SERVICES. Subject to Subchapter B, Chapter 540A, the commission may contract for the provision of public transportation services, as defined by Section 461.002, Transportation Code, under the medical transportation program, with:

(1) a public transportation provider, as defined by Section 461.002, Transportation Code;

(2) a private transportation provider; or

(3) a regional transportation broker.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0356. RULES FOR NONEMERGENCY TRANSPORTATION SERVICES; COMPLIANCE. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules to ensure the safe and efficient provision of nonemergency transportation services under this subchapter. The rules must:

(1) include minimum standards regarding the physical condition and maintenance of motor vehicles used to provide the services, including standards regarding the accessibility of motor vehicles by individuals with disabilities;

(2) require a regional contracted broker to:

(A) verify that each motor vehicle operator providing the services or seeking to provide the services has a valid driver's license;

(B) check the driving record information maintained by the Department of Public Safety under Subchapter C, Chapter 521, Transportation Code, of each motor vehicle operator providing the services or seeking to provide the services; and

(C) check the public criminal record information maintained by the Department of Public Safety and made available to the public through the department's Internet website of each motor vehicle operator providing the services or seeking to provide the services; and

(3) include training requirements for motor vehicle operators providing the services through a regional contracted broker, including training on:

(A) passenger safety;

(B) passenger assistance;

(C) assistive devices, including wheelchair lifts, tie-down equipment, and child safety seats;

(D) sensitivity and diversity;

(E) customer service;

(F) defensive driving techniques; and

(G) prohibited behavior by motor vehicle operators.

(b) Except as provided by Section 526.0358, the commission shall require compliance with the rules adopted under Subsection (a) in any contract entered into with a regional contracted broker to provide nonemergency transportation services under the medical transportation program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0357. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING; DRIVER AND VEHICLE INFORMATION. (a) The commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of Public Safety for purposes of obtaining the motor vehicle registration and driver's license information of a medical transportation services provider, including a regional contracted broker and a subcontractor of the broker, to confirm the provider complies with applicable requirements adopted under Section 526.0356(a).

(b) The commission shall establish a process by which medical transportation services providers, including providers under a managed transportation delivery model, that contract with the commission may request and obtain the information described by Subsection (a) to ensure that subcontractors providing medical transportation services meet applicable requirements adopted under Section 526.0356(a).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0358. MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION SERVICES SUBCONTRACTS. (a) A regional contracted broker may subcontract with a transportation network company to provide services under this subchapter. A rule or other requirement the executive commissioner adopts under Section 526.0356(a) does not apply to the subcontracted transportation network company or a motor vehicle operator who is part of the company's network. The commission or the regional contracted broker may not require a motor vehicle operator who is part of the subcontracted transportation network company's network to enroll as a Medicaid provider to provide services under this subchapter.

(b) The commission or a regional contracted broker that subcontracts with a transportation network company under Subsection (a) may require the transportation network company or a motor vehicle operator who provides services under this subchapter to be periodically screened against the list of excluded individuals and entities maintained by the Office of Inspector General of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a motor vehicle operator who is part of the network of a transportation network company that subcontracts with a regional contracted broker under Subsection (a) and who satisfies the driver requirements in Section 2402.107, Occupations Code, is qualified to provide services under this subchapter. The commission and the regional contracted broker may not impose any additional requirements on a motor vehicle operator who satisfies the driver requirements in Section 2402.107, Occupations Code, to provide services under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0359. CERTAIN PROVIDERS PROHIBITED FROM PROVIDING NONEMERGENCY TRANSPORTATION SERVICES. Emergency medical services personnel and emergency medical services vehicles, as those terms are defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code, may not provide nonemergency transportation services under the medical transportation program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0360. CERTAIN WHEELCHAIR-ACCESSIBLE VEHICLES AUTHORIZED. For purposes of this section and Sections 526.0354-526.0359 and notwithstanding Section 2402.111(a)(2)(A), Occupations Code, a motor vehicle operator who provides services under Sections 526.0354-526.0359 may use a wheelchair-accessible vehicle equipped with a lift or ramp that is capable of transporting passengers using a fixed-frame wheelchair in the cabin of the vehicle if the vehicle otherwise meets the requirements of Section 2402.111, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER I. CASEWORKERS AND PROGRAM PERSONNEL

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0401. CASELOAD STANDARDS FOR DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Caseload standards" means the minimum and maximum number of cases that an employee can reasonably be expected to perform in a normal work month based on the number of cases handled by or the number of different job functions performed by the employee.

(2) "Professional caseload standards" means caseload standards for employees of health and human services agencies that are established or are recommended for establishment by:

(A) management studies conducted for health and human services agencies; or

(B) an authority or association, including:

(i) the Child Welfare League of America;

(ii) the National Eligibility Workers Association;

(iii) the National Association of Social Workers; and

(iv) associations of state health and human services agencies.

(b) Subject to Chapter 316 (H.B. 5), Acts of the 85th Legislature, Regular Session, 2017, the executive commissioner may establish caseload standards and other standards relating to caseloads for each category of caseworker the Department of Family and Protective Services employs.

(c) In establishing standards under this section, the executive commissioner shall:

(1) ensure that the standards are based on the caseworker's actual duties;

(2) ensure that the caseload standards are reasonable and achievable;

(3) ensure that the standards are consistent with existing professional caseload standards;

(4) consider standards developed by other states for caseworkers in similar positions of employment; and

(5) ensure that the standards are consistent with existing caseload standards of other state agencies.

(d) Subject to the availability of funds the legislature appropriates:

(1) the commissioner of the Department of Family and Protective Services shall use the standards established under this section to determine the number of personnel to assign as caseworkers for the department; and

(2) the Department of Family and Protective Services shall use the standards established to assign caseloads to individual caseworkers the department employs.

(e) Nothing in this section may be construed to create a cause of action.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0402. JOINT TRAINING FOR CERTAIN CASEWORKERS. (a) The executive commissioner shall provide for joint training for health and human services caseworkers whose clients are children, including caseworkers employed by:

(1) the commission;

(2) the Department of State Health Services;

(3) a local mental health authority; and

(4) a local intellectual and developmental disability authority.

(b) The joint training must be designed to increase a caseworker's knowledge and awareness of the services available to children at each health and human services agency or local mental health or intellectual and developmental disability authority, including long-term care programs and services available under a Section 1915(c) waiver program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0403. COORDINATION AND APPROVAL OF CASELOAD ESTIMATES. (a) The commission shall coordinate and approve caseload estimates for programs health and human services agencies administer.

(b) To implement this section, the commission shall:

(1) adopt uniform guidelines for health and human services agencies to use in estimating each agency's caseload, with allowances given for those agencies for which exceptions from the guidelines may be necessary;

(2) assemble a single set of economic and demographic data and provide that data to each health and human services agency to use in estimating the agency's caseload; and

(3) seek advice from health and human services agencies, the Legislative Budget Board, the governor's budget office, the comptroller, and other relevant agencies as needed to coordinate the caseload estimating process.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0404. DEAF-BLIND WITH MULTIPLE DISABILITIES (DBMD) WAIVER PROGRAM: CAREER LADDER FOR INTERVENERS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Deaf-blind-related course work" means educational courses designed to improve a student's:

(A) knowledge of deaf-blindness and its effect on learning;

(B) knowledge of the intervention role and ability to facilitate the intervention process;

(C) knowledge of communication areas relevant to deaf-blindness, including methods, adaptations, and use of assistive technology, and ability to facilitate development and use of communication skills for an individual who is deaf-blind;

(D) knowledge of the effect deaf-blindness has on an individual's psychological, social, and emotional development and ability to facilitate the emotional well-being of an individual who is deaf-blind;

(E) knowledge of and issues related to sensory systems and ability to facilitate the use of the senses;

(F) knowledge of motor skills, movement, orientation, and mobility strategies and ability to facilitate orientation and mobility skills;

(G) knowledge of the effect additional disabilities have on an individual who is deaf-blind and ability to provide appropriate support; or

(H) professionalism and knowledge of ethical issues relevant to the intervener role.

(2) "Program" means the deaf-blind with multiple disabilities (DBMD) waiver program.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule shall adopt a career ladder for individuals who provide intervener services under the program. The rules must provide a system under which each individual may be classified based on the individual's level of training, education, and experience, as one of the following:

(1) Intervener;

(2) Intervener I;

(3) Intervener II; or

(4) Intervener III.

(c) The rules must require that:

(1) an Intervener:

(A) complete any orientation or training course required to be completed by any individual who provides direct care services to recipients of services under the program;

(B) hold a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate;

(C) have at least two years of experience working with individuals with developmental disabilities;

(D) have the ability to proficiently communicate in the functional language of the individual who is deaf-blind; and

(E) meet all direct-care worker qualifications as determined by the program;

(2) an Intervener I:

(A) meet the requirements of an Intervener under Subdivision (1);

(B) have at least six months of experience working with individuals who are deaf-blind; and

(C) have completed at least eight semester credit hours, plus a one-hour practicum in deaf-blind-related course work, at an accredited college or university;

(3) an Intervener II:

(A) meet the requirements of an Intervener I;

(B) have at least nine months of experience working with individuals who are deaf-blind; and

(C) have completed an additional 10 semester credit hours in deaf-blind-related course work at an accredited college or university; and

(4) an Intervener III:

(A) meet the requirements of an Intervener II;

(B) have at least one year of experience working with individuals who are deaf-blind; and

(C) hold an associate's or bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in a course of study with a focus on deaf-blind-related course work.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c), the executive commissioner may adopt a career ladder under this section based on credentialing standards for interveners developed by the Academy for Certification of Vision Rehabilitation and Education Professionals or any other private credentialing entity as the executive commissioner determines appropriate.

(e) The compensation an intervener receives for providing services under the program must be based on and commensurate with the intervener's career ladder classification.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER J. LICENSING, LISTING, OR REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN ENTITIES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0451. APPLICABILITY. (a) This subchapter applies only to the final licensing, listing, or registration decisions of a health and human services agency with respect to a person under the law authorizing the agency to regulate the following:

(1) a youth camp licensed under Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code;

(2) a home and community support services agency licensed under Chapter 142, Health and Safety Code;

(3) a hospital licensed under Chapter 241, Health and Safety Code;

(4) a facility licensed under Chapter 242, Health and Safety Code;

(5) an assisted living facility licensed under Chapter 247, Health and Safety Code;

(6) a special care facility licensed under Chapter 248, Health and Safety Code;

(7) an intermediate care facility licensed under Chapter 252, Health and Safety Code;

(8) a chemical dependency treatment facility licensed under Chapter 464, Health and Safety Code;

(9) a mental hospital or mental health facility licensed under Chapter 577, Health and Safety Code;

(10) a child-care facility or child-placing agency licensed under or a family home listed or registered under Chapter 42, Human Resources Code; or

(11) a day activity and health services facility licensed under Chapter 103, Human Resources Code.

(b) This subchapter does not apply to an agency decision that did not result in a final order or that was reversed on appeal.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0452. REQUIRED APPLICATION INFORMATION. An applicant submitting an initial or renewal application for a license, including a renewal license or a license that does not expire, a listing, or a registration described by Section 526.0451 must include with the application a written statement of:

(1) the name of any person who is or will be a controlling person, as the applicable agency regulating the person determines, of the entity for which the license, listing, or registration is sought; and

(2) any other relevant information required by rules the executive commissioner adopts.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0453. APPLICATION DENIAL BASED ON ADVERSE AGENCY DECISION. A health and human services agency that regulates a person to whom this subchapter applies may deny an application for a license, including a renewal license or a license that does not expire, a listing, or a registration described by Section 526.0451, if:

(1) any of the following persons are listed in a record maintained under Section 526.0454:

(A) the applicant;

(B) a person listed on the application; or

(C) a person the applicable regulating agency determines to be a controlling person of an entity for which the license, including a renewal license or a license that does not expire, the listing, or the registration is sought; and

(2) the agency's action resulting in the person being listed in a record maintained under Section 526.0454 is based on:

(A) an act or omission that resulted in physical or mental harm to an individual in the care of the applicant or person;

(B) a threat to the health, safety, or well-being of an individual in the care of the applicant or person;

(C) the physical, mental, or financial exploitation of an individual in the care of the applicant or person; or

(D) the agency's determination that the applicant or person has committed an act or omission that renders the applicant unqualified or unfit to fulfill the obligations of the license, listing, or registration.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0454. RECORD OF FINAL DECISION. (a) Each health and human services agency that regulates a person to whom this subchapter applies shall, in accordance with this section and rules the executive commissioner adopts, maintain a record of:

(1) each application for a license, including a renewal license or a license that does not expire, a listing, or a registration that the agency denies under the law authorizing the agency to regulate the person; and

(2) each license, listing, or registration that the agency revokes, suspends, or terminates under the applicable law.

(b) The record of an application required by Subsection (a)(1) must be maintained until the 10th anniversary of the date the application is denied. The record of the license, listing, or registration required by Subsection (a)(2) must be maintained until the 10th anniversary of the date of the revocation, suspension, or termination.

(c) The record required under Subsection (a) must include:

(1) the name and address of the applicant for a license, listing, or registration that is denied as described by Subsection (a)(1);

(2) the name and address of each person listed in the application for a license, listing, or registration that is denied as described by Subsection (a)(1);

(3) the name of each person the applicable regulatory agency determines to be a controlling person of an entity for which an application, license, listing, or registration is denied, revoked, suspended, or terminated as described by Subsection (a);

(4) the specific type of license, listing, or registration the agency denied, revoked, suspended, or terminated;

(5) a summary of the terms of the denial, revocation, suspension, or termination; and

(6) the effective period of the denial, revocation, suspension, or termination.

(d) Each health and human services agency that regulates a person to whom this subchapter applies each month shall provide a copy of the records maintained under this section to any other health and human services agency that regulates the person.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER K. CHILDREN AND FAMILIES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0501. SUBSTITUTE CARE PROVIDER OUTCOME STANDARDS. (a) The executive commissioner, after consulting with representatives from the commission, the Department of Family and Protective Services, and the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, shall by rule adopt result-oriented standards that a provider of substitute care services for children under the care of this state must achieve.

(b) A health and human services agency that purchases substitute care services shall include the result-oriented standards as requirements in each substitute care service provider contract.

(c) A health and human services agency may provide information about a substitute care provider, including rates, contracts, outcomes, and client information, to another agency that purchases substitute care services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0502. REPORT ON DELIVERY OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES TO YOUNG TEXANS. (a) The commission shall publish on the commission's Internet website a biennial report that addresses the efforts of the health and human services agencies to provide health and human services to children younger than six years of age.

(b) The report may:

(1) contain the commission's recommendations to better coordinate state agency programs relating to the delivery of health and human services to children younger than six years of age; and

(2) propose joint agency collaborative programs.

(c) On or before the date the report is due, the commission shall notify the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the comptroller, and the appropriate legislative committees that the report is available on the commission's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0503. POOLED FUNDING FOR FOSTER CARE PREVENTIVE SERVICES. (a) The commission and the Department of Family and Protective Services shall develop and implement a plan to combine, to the extent and in the manner allowed by Section 51, Article III, Texas Constitution, and other applicable law, funds held by those agencies with funds held by other appropriate state agencies and local governmental entities to provide services designed to prevent children from being placed in foster care. The preventive services may include:

(1) child and family counseling;

(2) instruction in parenting and homemaking skills;

(3) parental support services;

(4) temporary respite care; and

(5) crisis services.

(b) The plan must provide for:

(1) state funding to be distributed to other state agencies, local governmental entities, or private entities only as specifically directed by the terms of a grant or contract to provide preventive services;

(2) procedures to ensure that funds the commission receives by gift, grant, or interagency or interlocal contract from another state agency, a local governmental entity, the federal government, or any other public or private source for purposes of this section are disbursed in accordance with the terms under which the commission received the funds; and

(3) a reporting mechanism to ensure appropriate use of funds.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the commission may request and accept gifts and grants under the terms of a gift, grant, or contract from a local governmental entity, a private entity, or any other public or private source for use in providing services designed to prevent children from being placed in foster care. If required by the terms of a gift, grant, or contract or by applicable law, the commission shall use the amounts received:

(1) from a local governmental entity to provide the services in the geographic area of this state in which the entity is located; and

(2) from the federal government or a private entity to provide the services statewide or in a particular geographic area of this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0504. PARTICIPATION BY FATHERS. (a) The commission and each health and human services agency shall periodically examine commission or agency policies and procedures to determine if the policies and procedures deter or encourage participation of fathers in commission or agency programs and services relating to children.

(b) Based on the examination required under Subsection (a), the commission and each health and human services agency shall modify policies and procedures as necessary to permit full participation of fathers in commission or agency programs and services relating to children in all appropriate circumstances.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0505. PROHIBITED PUNITIVE ACTION FOR FAILURE TO IMMUNIZE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Person responsible for a child's care, custody, or welfare" has the meaning assigned by Section 261.001, Family Code.

(2) "Punitive action" includes initiating an investigation of a person responsible for a child's care, custody, or welfare for alleged or suspected abuse or neglect of a child.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule shall prohibit a health and human services agency from taking a punitive action against a person responsible for a child's care, custody, or welfare for the person's failure to ensure that the child receives the immunization series prescribed by Section 161.004, Health and Safety Code.

(c) This section does not affect a law, including Chapter 31, Human Resources Code, that specifically provides a punitive action for failure to ensure that a child receives the immunization series prescribed by Section 161.004, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0506. INVESTIGATION UNIT FOR CHILD-CARE FACILITIES OPERATING ILLEGALLY. The executive commissioner shall maintain a unit within the commission's child-care licensing division consisting of investigators whose primary responsibility is to:

(1) identify child-care facilities that are operating without a license, certification, registration, or listing required by Chapter 42, Human Resources Code; and

(2) initiate appropriate enforcement actions against those facilities.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER L. TEXAS HOME VISITING PROGRAM

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0551. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Home visiting program" means a voluntary-enrollment program in which early childhood and health professionals such as nurses, social workers, or trained and supervised paraprofessionals repeatedly visit over a period of at least six months the homes of pregnant women or families with children younger than six years of age who are born with or exposed to one or more risk factors.

(2) "Risk factors" means factors that make a child more likely to experience adverse experiences leading to negative consequences, including preterm birth, poverty, low parental education, having a teenaged mother or father, poor maternal health, and parental underemployment or unemployment.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0552. RULES. The executive commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0553. STRATEGIC PLAN; ELIGIBILITY. (a) The commission shall maintain a strategic plan to serve at-risk pregnant women and families with children younger than six years of age through home visiting programs that improve outcomes for parents and families.

(b) A pregnant woman or family is considered at-risk for purposes of this section and may be eligible for voluntary enrollment in a home visiting program if the woman or family is exposed to one or more risk factors.

(c) The commission may determine if a risk factor or combination of risk factors an at-risk pregnant woman or family experiences qualifies the woman or family for enrollment in a home visiting program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0554. TYPES OF HOME VISITING PROGRAMS. (a) A home visiting program is classified as either an evidence-based program or a promising practice program.

(b) An evidence-based program is a home visiting program that:

(1) is research-based and grounded in relevant, empirically based knowledge and program-determined outcomes;

(2) is associated with a national organization, institution of higher education, or national or state public health institute;

(3) has comprehensive standards that ensure high-quality service delivery and continuously improving quality;

(4) has demonstrated significant positive short-term and long-term outcomes;

(5) has been evaluated by at least one rigorous randomized controlled research trial across heterogeneous populations or communities, the results of at least one of which have been published in a peer-reviewed journal;

(6) follows with fidelity a program manual or design that specifies the purpose, outcomes, duration, and frequency of the services that constitute the program;

(7) employs well-trained and competent staff and provides continual relevant professional development opportunities;

(8) demonstrates strong links to other community-based services; and

(9) ensures compliance with home visiting standards.

(c) A promising practice program is a home visiting program that:

(1) has an active impact evaluation program or can demonstrate a timeline for implementing an active impact evaluation program;

(2) has been evaluated by at least one outcome-based study demonstrating effectiveness or a randomized controlled trial in a homogeneous sample;

(3) follows with fidelity a program manual or design that specifies the purpose, outcomes, duration, and frequency of the services that constitute the program;

(4) employs well-trained and competent staff and provides continual relevant professional development opportunities;

(5) demonstrates strong links to other community-based services; and

(6) ensures compliance with home visiting standards.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0555. OUTCOMES. The commission shall ensure that a home visiting program achieves favorable outcomes in at least two of the following areas:

(1) improved maternal or child health outcomes;

(2) improved cognitive development of children;

(3) increased school readiness of children;

(4) reduced child abuse, neglect, and injury;

(5) improved child safety;

(6) improved social-emotional development of children;

(7) improved parenting skills, including nurturing and bonding;

(8) improved family economic self-sufficiency;

(9) reduced parental involvement with the criminal justice system; and

(10) increased father involvement and support.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0556. EVALUATION OF HOME VISITING PROGRAM. (a) The commission shall adopt outcome indicators to measure the effectiveness of a home visiting program in achieving desired outcomes.

(b) The commission may work directly with the model developer of a home visiting program to identify appropriate outcome indicators for the program and to ensure that the program demonstrates fidelity to its research model.

(c) The commission shall develop internal processes to work with home visiting programs in sharing data and information to aid in relevant analysis of a home visiting program's performance.

(d) The commission shall use data gathered under this section to monitor, conduct ongoing quality improvement on, and evaluate the effectiveness of home visiting programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0557. FUNDING. (a) The commission shall ensure that at least 75 percent of the funds appropriated for home visiting programs is used in evidence-based programs described by Section 526.0554(b), with any remaining funds dedicated to promising practice programs described by Section 526.0554(c).

(b) The commission shall actively seek and apply for any available federal funds to support home visiting programs, including federal funds from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program.

(c) The commission may accept gifts, donations, and grants to support home visiting programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0558. REPORTS TO LEGISLATURE. (a) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall prepare and submit a report on state-funded home visiting programs to the Senate Committee on Health and Human Services and the House Human Services Committee or their successors.

(b) A report submitted under this section must include:

(1) a description of home visiting programs being implemented and the associated models;

(2) data on the number of families being served and their demographic information;

(3) the goals and achieved outcomes of home visiting programs;

(4) data on cost per family served, including third-party return-on-investment analysis, if available; and

(5) data explaining the percentage of funding that has been used on evidence-based programs and the percentage of funding that has been used on promising practice programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER M. SERVICE MEMBERS, DEPENDENTS, AND VETERANS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0601. SERVICES FOR SERVICE MEMBERS. (a) In this section, "service member" means a member or former member of the state military forces or a component of the United States armed forces, including a reserve component.

(b) The executive commissioner shall ensure that each health and human services agency adopts policies and procedures that require the agency to:

(1) identify service members who are seeking services from the agency during the agency's intake and eligibility determination process; and

(2) direct service members seeking services to appropriate service providers, including:

(A) the United States Veterans Health Administration;

(B) National Guard Bureau facilities; and

(C) other federal, state, and local service providers.

(c) The executive commissioner shall make the directory of resources established under Section 161.552, Health and Safety Code, accessible to each health and human services agency.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0602. INTEREST OR OTHER WAITING LIST FOR CERTAIN SERVICE MEMBERS AND DEPENDENTS. (a) In this section, "service member" means a member of the United States military serving in the army, navy, air force, marine corps, or coast guard on active duty.

(b) This section applies only to:

(1) a service member who has declared and maintains this state as the member's state of legal residence in the manner provided by the applicable military branch;

(2) a spouse or dependent child of a member described by Subdivision (1); or

(3) the spouse or dependent child of a former service member who had declared and maintained this state as the member's state of legal residence in the manner provided by the applicable military branch and who:

(A) was killed in action; or

(B) died while in service.

(c) The executive commissioner by rule shall require the commission or another health and human services agency to:

(1) maintain the position of an individual to whom this section applies in the queue of an interest list or other waiting list for any assistance program the commission or other health and human services agency provides, including a Section 1915(c) waiver program, if the individual cannot receive benefits under the assistance program because the individual temporarily resides out of state as the result of military service; and

(2) subject to Subsection (e), offer benefits to the individual according to the individual's position on the interest list or other waiting list that was attained while the individual resided out of state if the individual returns to reside in this state.

(d) If an individual to whom this section applies reaches a position on an interest list or other waiting list that would allow the individual to receive benefits under an assistance program but the individual cannot receive the benefits because the individual temporarily resides out of state as the result of military service, the commission or agency providing the benefits shall maintain the individual's position on the list relative to other individuals on the list but continue to offer benefits to other individuals on the interest list or other waiting list in accordance with those individuals' respective positions on the list.

(e) In adopting rules under Subsection (c), the executive commissioner must limit the amount of time an individual to whom this section applies may maintain the individual's position on an interest list or other waiting list under Subsection (c) to not more than one year after the date on which, as applicable:

(1) the service member's active duty ends;

(2) the member was killed if the member was killed in action; or

(3) the member died if the member died while in service.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0603. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING REGARDING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE REPORTING INFORMATION SYSTEM; MAXIMIZATION OF BENEFITS. (a) In this section, "system" means the Public Assistance Reporting Information System (PARIS) operated by the Administration for Children and Families of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(b) The commission, the Texas Veterans Commission, and the Veterans' Land Board shall enter into a memorandum of understanding for the purposes of:

(1) coordinating and collecting information about state agencies' use and analysis of data received from the system; and

(2) developing new strategies for state agencies to use system data in ways that:

(A) generate fiscal savings for this state; and

(B) maximize the availability of and access to benefits for veterans.

(c) The commission and the Texas Veterans Commission:

(1) shall coordinate to assist veterans in maximizing the benefits available to each veteran by using the system; and

(2) together may determine the geographic scope of the efforts described by Subdivision (1).

(d) Not later than October 1 of each year, the commission, the Texas Veterans Commission, and the Veterans' Land Board collectively shall submit to the legislature, the governor, and the Legislative Budget Board a report describing:

(1) interagency progress in identifying and obtaining United States Department of Veterans Affairs benefits for veterans receiving Medicaid and other public benefits;

(2) the number of veterans benefits claims awarded, the total dollar amount of veterans benefits claims awarded, and the costs to this state that were avoided as a result of state agencies' use of the system;

(3) efforts to expand the use of the system and improve the effectiveness of shifting veterans from Medicaid and other public benefits to United States Department of Veterans Affairs benefits, including any barriers and the manner in which state agencies have addressed those barriers; and

(4) the extent to which the Texas Veterans Commission has targeted specific veteran populations, including populations in rural counties and in specific age and service-connected disability categories, in order to maximize benefits for veterans and savings to this state.

(e) The report may be consolidated with any other report relating to the same subject matter the commission is required to submit under other law.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER N. PLAN TO SUPPORT GUARDIANSHIPS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0651. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Guardian" has the meaning assigned by Section 1002.012, Estates Code.

(2) "Guardianship program" has the meaning assigned by Section 155.001.

(3) "Incapacitated individual" means an incapacitated person as defined by Section 1002.017, Estates Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0652. PLAN ESTABLISHMENT. The commission shall develop and, subject to appropriations, implement a plan to:

(1) ensure that each incapacitated individual in this state who needs a guardianship or another less restrictive type of assistance to make decisions concerning the incapacitated individual's own welfare and financial affairs receives that assistance; and

(2) foster the establishment and growth of local volunteer guardianship programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0653. GUARDIANSHIP PROGRAM GRANT REQUIREMENTS. (a) The commission in accordance with commission rules may award grants to:

(1) a local guardianship program; and

(2) a local legal guardianship program to enable the family members and friends with low incomes of a proposed ward who is indigent to have legal representation in court if the individuals are willing and able to be appointed guardians of the proposed ward.

(b) To receive a grant under Subsection (a)(1), a local guardianship program operating in a county with a population of at least 150,000 must offer or submit a plan acceptable to the commission to offer, among the program's services, a money management service for appropriate clients, as determined by the program. The program may provide the money management service directly or by referring a client to a money management service that satisfies the requirements under Subsection (c).

(c) A money management service to which a local guardianship program may refer a client must:

(1) use employees or volunteers to provide bill payment or representative payee services;

(2) provide the service's employees and volunteers with training, technical support, monitoring, and supervision;

(3) match employees or volunteers with clients in a manner that ensures that the match is agreeable to both the employee or volunteer and the client;

(4) insure each employee and volunteer and hold the employee or volunteer harmless from liability for damages proximately caused by acts or omissions of the employee or volunteer while acting in the course and scope of the employee's or volunteer's duties or functions within the organization;

(5) have an advisory council that meets regularly and is composed of individuals who are knowledgeable with respect to issues related to guardianship, alternatives to guardianship, and related social services programs;

(6) be administered by a nonprofit corporation:

(A) formed under the Texas Nonprofit Corporation Law, as described by Section 1.008, Business Organizations Code; and

(B) exempt from taxation under Section 501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, by being listed as an exempt entity under Section 501(c)(3) of that code; and

(7) refer clients who are in need of other services from an area agency on aging to the appropriate area agency on aging.

(d) A local guardianship program operating in a county with a population of less than 150,000 may, at the program's option, offer, either directly or by referral, a money management service among the program's services. If the program elects to offer a money management service by referral, the service must satisfy the requirements under Subsection (c), except as provided by Subsection (e).

(e) On request by a local guardianship program, the commission may waive a requirement under Subsection (c) if the commission determines the waiver is appropriate to strengthen the continuum of local guardianship programs in a geographic area.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER O. ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FOR DOMESTIC VICTIMS OF TRAFFICKING

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0701. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Domestic victim" means a victim of trafficking who is a permanent legal resident or citizen of the United States.

(2) "Victim of trafficking" has the meaning assigned by 22 U.S.C. Section 7102.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0702. VICTIM ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. The commission shall develop and implement a program designed to assist domestic victims, including victims who are children, in accessing necessary services. The program must include:

(1) a searchable database of assistance programs for domestic victims that may be used to match victims with appropriate resources, including:

(A) programs that provide mental health services;

(B) other health services;

(C) services to meet victims' basic needs;

(D) case management services; and

(E) any other services the commission considers appropriate;

(2) the grant program described by Section 526.0703;

(3) recommended training programs for judges, prosecutors, and law enforcement personnel; and

(4) an outreach initiative to ensure that victims, judges, prosecutors, and law enforcement personnel are aware of the availability of services through the program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0703. GRANT PROGRAM. (a) Subject to available funds, the commission shall establish a grant program to award grants to public and nonprofit organizations that provide assistance to domestic victims, including organizations that provide public awareness activities, community outreach and training, victim identification services, and legal services.

(b) To apply for a grant under this section, an applicant must submit an application in the form and manner the commission prescribes. An applicant must describe in the application the services the applicant intends to provide to domestic victims if the grant is awarded.

(c) In awarding grants under this section, the commission shall give preference to organizations that have experience in successfully providing the types of services for which the grants are awarded.

(d) A grant recipient shall provide the reports the commission requires regarding the use of grant funds.

(e) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit a report to the legislature:

(1) summarizing the activities, funding, and outcomes of programs awarded a grant under this section; and

(2) providing recommendations regarding the grant program.

(f) For purposes of Subchapter I, Chapter 659:

(1) the commission, for the sole purpose of administering the grant program under this section, is considered an eligible charitable organization entitled to participate in the state employee charitable campaign; and

(2) a state employee is entitled to authorize a deduction for contributions to the commission for the purposes of administering the grant program under this section as a charitable contribution under Section 659.132, and the commission may use the contributions as provided by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0704. TRAINING PROGRAMS. The commission, with assistance from the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System, the Department of Public Safety, and local law enforcement agencies, shall create training programs designed to increase the awareness of judges, prosecutors, and law enforcement personnel on:

(1) the needs of domestic victims;

(2) the availability of services under this subchapter;

(3) the database of services described by Section 526.0702; and

(4) potential funding sources for those services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0705. FUNDING. The commission may use appropriated funds and may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any sources for purposes of the victim assistance program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER P. AGING ADULTS WITH VISUAL IMPAIRMENTS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0751. OUTREACH CAMPAIGNS FOR AGING ADULTS WITH VISUAL IMPAIRMENTS. (a) The commission, in collaboration with the Texas State Library and Archives Commission and other appropriate state agencies, shall conduct public awareness and education outreach campaigns designed to provide information relating to the programs and resources available to aging adults who are blind or visually impaired in this state.

(b) The campaigns must be:

(1) tailored to targeted populations, including:

(A) aging adults with or at risk of blindness or visual impairment and the families and caregivers of those adults;

(B) health care providers, including home and community-based services providers, health care facilities, and emergency medical services providers;

(C) community and faith-based organizations; and

(D) the public; and

(2) disseminated through methods appropriate for each targeted population, including by:

(A) attending health fairs; and

(B) working with organizations or groups that serve aging adults, including community clinics, libraries, support groups for aging adults, veterans organizations, for-profit providers of vision services, and the state and local chapters of the National Federation of the Blind.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0752. RULES. The executive commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 526.0753. COMMISSION SUPPORT. To support campaigns conducted under this subchapter, the commission shall:

(1) establish a toll-free telephone number for providing counseling and referrals to appropriate services for aging adults who are blind or visually impaired;

(2) post on the commission's Internet website information and training resources for aging adults, community stakeholders, and health care and other service providers that generally serve aging adults, including:

(A) links to Internet websites that contain resources for individuals who are blind or visually impaired;

(B) existing videos that provide awareness of blindness and visual impairments among aging adults and the importance of early intervention;

(C) best practices for referring aging adults at risk of blindness or visual impairment for appropriate services; and

(D) training about resources available for aging adults who are blind or visually impaired for the staff of aging and disability resource centers established under the Aging and Disability Resource Center initiative funded partly by the federal Administration on Aging and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;

(3) designate a commission contact to assist aging adults who are diagnosed with a visual impairment and are losing vision and the families of those adults with locating and obtaining appropriate services; and

(4) encourage awareness of the reading services the Texas State Library and Archives Commission offers for individuals who are blind or visually impaired.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.